el: Εξαερισμός τάπας καυσίμου: Χωρίς εξαερισμό; Εκτόνωση πίεσης και κενού; Μόνο εκτόνωση πίεσης; Μόνο εκτόνωση κενού; Με εξαερισμό; Άλλο
sk-SK: Odvzdušnenie palivového uzáveru: Bez odvetrávania; Na uvoľnenie tlaku a vákua; Len na uvoľnenie tlaku; Len na uvoľnenie vákua; S odvetrávaním; Iné
nl: Brandstofdop ontluchting: Niet-geventileerd; Overdruk en onderdruk; Alleen overdruk; Alleen onderdruk; Geventileerd; Anders
ro-RO: Aerisirea capacului de combustibil: Fără aerisire; Eliberare presiune și vid; Doar eliberare presiune; Doar eliberare vid; Cu aerisire; Altele
da: Ventilation i brændstofdæksel: Uden udluftning; Overtryks- og vakuumventil; Kun overtryksventil; Kun vakuumventil; Med udluftning; Andet
tr: Yakıt deposu kapağı havalandırması: Havalandırmasız; Basınç ve vakum tahliyeli; Yalnızca basınç tahliyeli; Yalnızca vakum tahliyeli; Havalandırmalı; Diğer
nb: Lufting av drivstofflokk: Ikke-ventilert; Overtrykks- og vakuumventil; Kun overtrykksventil; Kun vakuumventil; Ventilert; Annet
sv: Ventilering av bränslelock: Oventilerad; Övertrycks- och vakuumventil; Endast övertrycksventil; Endast vakuumventil; Ventilerad; Övrigt
ru: Вентиляция крышки топлива: Невентилируемая; Сброс давления и вакуума; Только сброс давления; Только сброс вакуума; Вентилируемая; Другое
sl-SI: Odzračevanje pokrovčka goriva: Brez odzračevanja; Sprostitev tlaka in vakuuma; Samo sprostitev tlaka; Samo sprostitev vakuuma; Z odzračevanjem; Drugo
ko: 연료 캡 통기 방식: 비환기형; 압력 및 진공 방출; 압력 방출 전용; 진공 방출 전용; 환기형; 기타
de: Tankdeckelentlüftung: Unbelüftet; Über- und Unterdruckventil; Nur Überdruckventil; Nur Unterdruckventil; Belüftet; Sonstige
hu: Üzemanyagsapka szellőzése: Nem szellőző; Nyomás- és vákuumcsökkentős; Csak nyomáscsökkentős; Csak vákuumcsökkentős; Szellőző; Egyéb
th: การระบายอากาศฝาถังน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง: แบบไม่ระบายอากาศ; ระบายแรงดันและสุญญากาศ; ระบายแรงดันเท่านั้น; ระบายสุญญากาศเท่านั้น; แบบระบายอากาศ; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 油箱盖通气设计: 无排气孔; 压力和真空释放; 仅泄压; 仅真空释放; 排气式; 其他
pt-BR: Ventilação da tampa do tanque de combustível: Sem ventilação; Alívio de pressão e vácuo; Apenas alívio de pressão; Apenas alívio de vácuo; Ventilado; Outro
fi: Polttoainekorkin ilmanvaihto: Tuulettamaton; Yli- ja alipaineen vapautus; Vain ylipaineen vapautus; Vain alipaineen vapautus; Tuuletettu; Muu
hr-HR: Odzračivanje čepa za gorivo: Bez odzračivanja; Otpuštanje tlaka i vakuuma; Samo otpuštanje tlaka; Samo otpuštanje vakuuma; S odzračivanjem; Ostalo
zh-TW: 燃油蓋通氣方式: 無排氣孔; 壓力與真空釋放; 僅釋壓; 僅真空釋放; 排氣式; 其他
bg-BG: Вентилация на капачката на резервоара: Без отдушник; За освобождаване на налягането и вакуума; Само за освобождаване на налягането; Само за освобождаване на вакуума; С отдушник; Друго
cs: Odvětrávání víčka palivové nádrže: Bez odvětrávání; Uvolnění tlaku a podtlaku; Pouze uvolnění tlaku; Pouze uvolnění podtlaku; S odvětráváním; Ostatní
pl: Odpowietrzanie korka wlewu paliwa: Bez odpowietrznika; Redukcja ciśnienia i podciśnienia; Tylko redukcja ciśnienia; Tylko redukcja podciśnienia; Z odpowietrznikiem; Inne
ja: 燃料キャップの通気: ベントなし; 圧力・真空解放; 圧力解放のみ; 真空解放のみ; ベント付き; その他
es: Ventilación de la tapa de combustible: Sin ventilación; Alivio de presión y vacío; Solo alivio de presión; Solo alivio de vacío; Ventilado; Otro
it: Sfiato del tappo del serbatoio: Senza sfiato; Scarico pressione e vuoto; Solo scarico pressione; Solo scarico vuoto; Con sfiato; Altro
pt-PT: Ventilação da tampa do combustível: Sem ventilação; Alívio de pressão e vácuo; Apenas alívio de pressão; Apenas alívio de vácuo; Ventilado; Outro
lt-LT: Kuro dangtelio ventiliacija: Nevėdinamas; Slėgio ir vakuumo mažinimas; Tik slėgio mažinimas; Tik vakuumo mažinimas; Vėdinamas; Kita
fr: Ventilation du bouchon de carburant: Non ventilé; Décharge de pression et de vide; Décharge de pression uniquement; Décharge de vide uniquement; Ventilé; Autre
en: Fuel cap venting: Non-vented; Pressure & vacuum relief; Pressure relief only; Vacuum relief only; Vented; Other
vi: Thông hơi nắp bình xăng: Không có lỗ thông hơi; Xả áp suất và chân không; Chỉ xả áp; Chỉ xả chân không; Có lỗ thông hơi; Khác